District of Columbia statutes.
42-3173.01

Definitions.

For the purposes of this subchapter, the term:

(1)

“Department” means the Department of Housing and Community Development.

(2)

“Deteriorated structure” means a structure that:

(A)

Is unoccupied;

(B)

The Mayor has determined:

(i)

Constitutes a threat to the public health, safety, or welfare; or

(ii)

Contributes to the deterioration or dilapidation of the community in which the structure is located; and

(C)

Violates one or more provisions of the District of Columbia Construction Codes, as defined in subsection 101.2 of Title 12A of the District of Columbia Municipal Regulations (12A DCMR § 101.2), or the District of Columbia Housing Code, set forth in Title 14 of the District of Columbia Municipal Regulations (14 DCMR § 100 et seq.).

(3)

“Enclose” means to use barricades, boards, fences, or other means to preclude access, including access by environmental elements, to a structure or site.

(4)

“Interested party” means, with respect to a deteriorated structure:

(A)

An owner, as recorded in the real estate tax assessment records of the District of Columbia;

(B)

A titleholder, as reflected in the records of the Recorder of Deeds; or

(C)

A lienholder, as reflected in the records of the Recorder of Deeds.

(5)

“Site” means the deteriorated structure and the lot or lots on which the structure is located.

(6)

“Sufficient action” means the action specified by the Mayor pursuant to § 42-3173.05(a)(8).

(7)

“Unoccupied” means not occupied by an owner or a tenant, as defined in § 42-3501.03(36).

Apr. 27, 2001, D.C. Law 13-281, § 441
as added Apr. 19, 2002, D.C. Law 14-114, § 102, 49 DCR 1468
Oct. 19, 2002, D.C. Law 14-213, § 29(c), 49 DCR 8140
D.C. Law 14-213, in par. (6), substituted “§ 42-3173.05(a)(7)” for “§ 42-3173.05(a)(8)”.
Delegation of Authority Pursuant to D.C. Law 14-114, the “Housing Act of 2002”, see Mayor’s Order 2003-39, March 21, 2003 ( 50 DCR 2508).